Wisconsin, session 2025, AB470.
do enact as follows:AB470,11Section 1. 111.01 of the statutes is created to read:AB470,2,42111.01 Declaration of policy. The public policy of the state as to 3employment relations and collective bargaining, in the furtherance of which this 4subchapter is enacted, is declared to be as follows:AB470,2,85(1) It recognizes that there are 3 major interests involved, namely: the public, 6the employee, and the employer. These 3 interests are to a considerable extent 7interrelated. It is the policy of the state to protect and promote each of these 8interests with due regard to the situation and to the rights of the others.AB470,3,59(2) Industrial peace, regular and adequate income for the employee, and 10uninterrupted production of goods and services are promotive of all of these 11interests. They are largely dependent upon the maintenance of fair, friendly, and 12mutually satisfactory employment relations and the availability of suitable 13machinery for the peaceful adjustment of whatever controversies may arise. It is 14recognized that certain employers, including farmers, farmer cooperatives, and 15unincorporated farmer cooperative associations, in addition to their general 16employer problems, face special problems arising from perishable commodities and 17seasonal production that require adequate consideration. It is also recognized that 18whatever may be the rights of disputants with respect to each other in any 1controversy regarding employment relations, they should not be permitted, in the 2conduct of their controversy, to intrude directly into the primary rights of 3rd 3parties to earn a livelihood, transact business, and engage in the ordinary affairs of 4life by any lawful means and free from molestation, interference, restraint, or 5coercion.AB470,3,106(3) Negotiations of terms and conditions of work should result from voluntary 7agreement between employer and employee. For the purpose of such negotiation an 8employee has the right, if the employee desires, to associate with others in 9organizing and bargaining collectively through representatives of the employee’s 10own choosing, without intimidation or coercion from any source.AB470,3,1711(4) It is the policy of the state, in order to preserve and promote the interests 12of the public, the employee, and the employer alike, to establish standards of fair 13conduct in employment relations and to provide a convenient, expeditious, and 14impartial tribunal by which these interests may have their respective rights and 15obligations adjudicated. While limiting individual and group rights of aggression 16and defense, the state substitutes processes of justice for the more primitive 17methods of trial by combat.AB470,218Section 2. 111.04 (1) and (2) of the statutes are consolidated, renumbered 19111.04 and amended to read:AB470,4,420111.04 Rights of employees. Employees shall have the right of self-21organization and the right to form, join or assist labor organizations, to bargain 22collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in lawful, 23concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or 1protection. (2) Employees shall also have the right to refrain from self-2organization; forming, joining, or assisting labor organizations; bargaining 3collectively through representatives; or engaging in activities for the purpose of 4collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection such activities.AB470,35Section 3. 111.04 (3) of the statutes is repealed.AB470,46Section 4. 111.06 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB470,5,117111.06 (1) (c) To encourage or discourage membership in any labor 8organization, employee agency, committee, association, or representation plan by 9discrimination in regard to hiring, tenure, or other terms or conditions of 10employment except in a collective bargaining unit where an all-union agreement is 11in effect. An employer may enter into an all-union agreement with the voluntarily 12recognized representative of the employees in a collective bargaining unit, where at 13least a majority of such employees voting have voted affirmatively, by secret ballot, 14in favor of the all-union agreement in a referendum conducted by the commission, 15except that where the bargaining representative has been certified by either the 16commission or the national labor relations board as the result of a representation 17election, no referendum is required to authorize the entry into an all-union 18agreement. An authorization of an all-union agreement continues, subject to the 19right of either party to the all-union agreement to petition the commission to 20conduct a new referendum on the subject. Upon receipt of the petition, if the 21commission determines there is reasonable ground to believe that the employees 22concerned have changed their attitude toward the all-union agreement, the 23commission shall conduct a referendum. If the continuance of the all-union 1agreement is supported on a referendum by a vote at least equal to that provided in 2this paragraph for its initial authorization, it may continue, subject to the right to 3petition for a further vote by the procedure under this paragraph. If the 4continuance of the all-union agreement is not supported on a referendum, it 5terminates at the expiration of the contract of which it is then a part or at the end of 6one year from the date of the announcement by the commission of the result of the 7referendum, whichever is earlier. The commission shall declare any all-union 8agreement terminated whenever it finds that the labor organization involved has 9unreasonably refused to receive as a member any employee of such employer. An 10interested person may, as provided in s. 111.07, request the commission to perform 11this duty.AB470,512Section 5. 111.06 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB470,5,1513111.06 (1) (e) To bargain collectively with the representatives of less than a 14majority of the employer’s employees in a collective bargaining unit, or to enter into 15an all-union agreement except in the manner provided in par. (c).AB470,616Section 6. 111.06 (1) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB470,5,2317111.06 (1) (i) To deduct labor organization dues or assessments from an 18employee’s earnings, unless the employer has been presented with an individual 19order therefor, signed by the employee personally, and terminable at the end of any 20year of its life by the employee giving to the employer at least 30 days’ written notice 21of the termination. This paragraph applies to the extent permitted under federal 22law unless there is an all-union agreement in effect. The employer shall give notice 23to the labor organization of receipt of a notice of termination.AB470,71Section 7. 947.20 of the statutes is repealed.AB470,6,22